Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. General Administrative Provisions

§ 111.
Records; restrictions; penalties.

The names of or information pertaining to applicants for or recipients of assistance or benefits, including information obtained under section 112 of this title, shall not be disclosed to anyone, except for the purposes directly connected with the administration of the Department or when required by law.
(a) (1) The names of or information pertaining to applicants for or recipients of assistance or benefits, including information obtained under section 112 of this title, shall not be disclosed to anyone, except for the purposes directly connected with the administration of the Department or when required by law.

Names of or information pertaining to applicants for or recipients of Medicaid shall be subject to the confidentiality provisions set forth in section 1902a of this title.

A person shall not publish, use, disclose, or divulge any of those records for purposes not directly connected with the administration of programs of the Department or contrary to rules adopted by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

1969, No. 99

;

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. April 14, 1974;

1975, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 20, 2014;

2015, No. 29

, § 12;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.306.8;

2021, No. 20

, § 274.

§ 112.
Banks and agencies to furnish information.

An officer of a financial institution, as described in

8 V.S.A. § 11101(32)

, a credit union, or an independent trust company in this State, when requested by the Commissioner, shall furnish the Commissioner information in the possession of the bank or company with reference to any person or his or her spouse who is applying for or is receiving assistance or benefits from the Department.

Any governmental official or agency in the State, when requested by the Commissioner, shall furnish him or her information in the official’s or agency’s possession with reference to aid given or money paid or to be paid to any person or person’s spouse who is applying for or is receiving assistance or benefits from the Department.

The Commissioner of Taxes, when requested by the Commissioner for Children and Families, and unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, shall compare the information furnished by an applicant or recipient of assistance with the State income tax returns filed by such person and shall report his or her findings to the Commissioner for Children and Families. Each application for assistance shall contain a form of consent, executed by the applicant, granting permission to the Commissioner of Taxes to disclose such information to the Commissioner for Children and Families.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

1975, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 2, 2002;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 113.
Repealed. 2013, No. 131 (Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 114.
Allocation of payments when appropriation insufficient.

Should the funds available for assistance be insufficient to provide assistance to all those eligible, the amounts of assistance granted in any program or portion thereof shall be reduced equitably, in the discretion of the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

1971, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 7, 1972;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 71;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.37.

§ 115.
Repealed. 2013, No. 131 (Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 116.
State-placed students.

To enable a school district to determine if a student is a State-placed student, as defined in

16 V.S.A. § 11(a)(28)

, the Commissioner for Children and Families shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools for the school district educating the student if the parent or parents of a student under the care and custody of the Commissioner move from or into that school district.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 20, 2014.